District of Columbia statutes.
25-203

Transfer of functions of Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

All positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, assessments, and other funds available or to be made available to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs relating to the duties and functions assigned herein are transferred to ABRA.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-207.